Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-810
Revenue bonds; onstreet parking meters; revenue; use; exception.

Any city of the first class is authorized to use any or all of the revenue from onstreet parking meters for the purpose set forth in section 16-802 if such revenue has not been pledged for the payment of revenue bonds authorized herein.

Laws 1955, c. 35, § 10, p. 147.